Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 12
COLORADO SECOND CHANCE SCHOLARSHIP

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-231, see section 1 of chapter 290, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

23-3.3-1201 to 23-3.3-1203. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part repealed, (HB 22-1276), ch. 127, p. 890, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This part 12 was added in 2019 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2022. For the text of this part 12 prior to 2022, consult the 2021 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.